02_Morphology/lat.lexc
! Choose a language and implement basic noun morphotactics for 20 nouns, including any cases, possessives and productive derivations.

Multichar_Symbols
%<noun%>			! noun

%<m%>				! masculine
%<f%>				! feminine
%<n%>				! neuter

!	%<d1%>			! first declension
!	%<d2%>			! second declension
!	%<d3%>			! third declension
!	%<d4%>			! fourth declension
!	%<d5%>			! fifth declension

%<nom%>				! nominative case
%<gen%>				! genitive case
%<dat%>				! dative case
%<acc%>				! accusative case
%<abl%>				! ablative case
%<voc%>				! vocative case
%<loc%>				! locative case

%<sg%>				! singular
%<pl%>				! plural


! Most if not all declensions have variants
! for Greek loanwords. However, since there are
! none in the 20 most frequent nouns in the corpus,
! I am omitting those rules.
LEXICON Root

Declension1;
Declension2;
Declension3;
Declension4;
Declension5;
Indeclinable;
! TODO: fix/finish gender tags

! First-declension nouns
! This declension is pretty regular except for Greek loanwords
! Of which there are none in the top 20 most frequent nouns
! So I do not include the rules for those
LEXICON N1
N1-SG;
N1-PL;

LEXICON N1-dea
N1-SG;
%<nom%>%<pl%>: %>ae #;
%<gen%>%<pl%>: %>ārum #;
%<dat%>%<pl%>: %>ābus #;
%<acc%>%<pl%>: %>ās #;
%<abl%>%<pl%>: %>ābus #;
%<voc%>%<pl%>: %>ae #;

LEXICON N1-SG
%<nom%>%<sg%>: %>a #;
%<gen%>%<sg%>: %>ae #;
%<dat%>%<sg%>: %>ae #;
%<acc%>%<sg%>: %>am #;
%<abl%>%<sg%>: %>ā #;
%<voc%>%<sg%>: %>a #;

LEXICON N1-PL
%<nom%>%<pl%>: %>ae #;
%<gen%>%<pl%>: %>ārum #;
%<dat%>%<pl%>: %>īs #;
%<acc%>%<pl%>: %>ās #;
%<abl%>%<pl%>: %>īs #;
%<voc%>%<pl%>: %>ae #;
!%<loc%>%<pl%>: %>īs #;

! Second-declension masculine nouns
! In the second declension, neuter and masculine
! nouns have a few different endings.
! TODO: This is the only one where the vocative
! Differs from the nominative (singular only = -e or -i for ius)
! -r stems are the same
! TODO: account for r stems
LEXICON N2-M
N2-M-SG;
N2-M-PL;

LEXICON N2-M-SG
%<nom%>%<sg%>: %>us #;	! diff for neuter
%<gen%>%<sg%>: %>ī #;
%<dat%>%<sg%>: %>ō #;
%<acc%>%<sg%>: %>um #;
%<abl%>%<sg%>: %>ō #;
%<voc%>%<sg%>: %>e #;

LEXICON N2-M-PL
%<nom%>%<pl%>: %>ī #;	! diff for neuter
%<gen%>%<pl%>: %>ōrum #;
%<dat%>%<pl%>: %>īs #;
%<acc%>%<pl%>: %>ōs #;	! diff for neuter
%<abl%>%<pl%>: %>īs #;
%<voc%>%<pl%>: %>ī #;

LEXICON N2-M-r
%<nom%>%<sg%>: #;
%<gen%>%<sg%>: %>ī #;
%<dat%>%<sg%>: %>ō #;
%<acc%>%<sg%>: %>um #;
%<abl%>%<sg%>: %>ō #;
%<voc%>%<pl%>: #;
N2-M-PL;

! Second-declension neuter nouns
LEXICON N2-N
%<nom%>%<sg%>: %>um #;	! diff for neuter
%<gen%>%<sg%>: %>ī #;
%<dat%>%<sg%>: %>ō #;
%<acc%>%<sg%>: %>um #;
%<abl%>%<sg%>: %>ō #;
%<voc%>%<sg%>: %>um #;

%<nom%>%<pl%>: %>a #;	! diff for neuter
%<gen%>%<pl%>: %>ōrum #;
%<dat%>%<pl%>: %>īs #;
%<acc%>%<pl%>: %>a #;	! diff for neuter
%<abl%>%<pl%>: %>īs #;
%<voc%>%<pl%>: %>a #;
!%<loc%>%<pl%>: %>īs #;

! In addition to the standard 2nd declension singulars,
! Deus has an irregular alt. vocative singular
! and multiple plurals
LEXICON N2-M-deus
de N2-M-SG;
%<voc%>%<sg%>: de%>us #;

%<nom%>%<pl%>: d%>ī #;
%<nom%>%<pl%>: di%>ī #;
%<nom%>%<pl%>: de%>ī #;

%<gen%>%<pl%>: de%>ōrum #;
%<gen%>%<pl%>: de%>um #;
%<gen%>%<pl%>: di%>vom #;

%<dat%>%<pl%>: d%>īs #;
%<dat%>%<pl%>: di%>īs #;
%<dat%>%<pl%>: de%>īs #;

%<acc%>%<pl%>: de%>ōs #;

%<abl%>%<pl%>: d%>īs #;
%<abl%>%<pl%>: di%>īs #;
%<abl%>%<pl%>: de%>īs #;

%<voc%>%<pl%>: d%>ī #;
%<voc%>%<pl%>: di%>ī #;
%<voc%>%<pl%>: de%>ī #;

! Masculine & feminine third-declension nouns
! There is no regular nominative singular;
! Those just have to be memorized
LEXICON N3-MF
! diff for istems; but there are none in the wordlist
! the nominative/vocative singular is never consistent LOL
%<gen%>%<sg%>: %>is #;
%<dat%>%<sg%>: %>ī #;
%<acc%>%<sg%>: %>em #;
%<abl%>%<sg%>: %>e #;
%<loc%>%<sg%>: %>e #;

%<nom%>%<pl%>: %>ēs #;
%<gen%>%<pl%>: %>um #;
%<dat%>%<pl%>: %>ibus #;
%<acc%>%<pl%>: %>ēs #;
%<abl%>%<pl%>: %>ibus #;
%<voc%>%<pl%>: %>ēs #;
!%<loc%>%<pl%>: %>ibus #;

! Neuters
! nom, voc, accus singular all = lemma
LEXICON N3-N
%<gen%>%<sg%>: %>is #;
%<dat%>%<sg%>: %>ī #;
%<abl%>%<sg%>: %>e #;
!%<loc%>%<sg%>: %>e #;

%<nom%>%<pl%>: %>a #;
%<gen%>%<pl%>: %>um #;
%<dat%>%<pl%>: %>ibus #;
%<acc%>%<pl%>: %>a #;
%<abl%>%<pl%>: %>ibus #;
%<voc%>%<pl%>: %>a #;
!%<loc%>%<pl%>: %>ibus #;

! Masculine & feminine fourth-declension nouns
! Neuter nouns have a different pattern
! but there are none in the wordlist
! There are also no -ū stems in the wordlist
LEXICON N4-MF
%<nom%>%<sg%>: %>us #;
%<gen%>%<sg%>: %>ūs #;
%<dat%>%<sg%>: %>uī #;
%<acc%>%<sg%>: %>um #;
%<abl%>%<sg%>: %>ū #;
%<voc%>%<sg%>: %>us #;
!%<loc%>%<sg%>: %>ū #;

%<nom%>%<pl%>: %>ūs #;
%<gen%>%<pl%>: %>uum #;
%<dat%>%<pl%>: %>ibus #;
%<acc%>%<pl%>: %>ūs #;
%<abl%>%<pl%>: %>ibus #;
%<voc%>%<pl%>: %>ūs #;
!%<loc%>%<pl%>: %>ibus #;

! domus has a mix of 2nd & 4th declension forms
! and also a locative
LEXICON N4-domus
%<nom%>%<sg%>: %>us #;
%<gen%>%<sg%>: %>ūs #;
%<gen%>%<sg%>: %>ī #;
%<dat%>%<sg%>: %>uī #;
%<dat%>%<sg%>: %>ō #;
%<dat%>%<sg%>: %>ū #;
%<acc%>%<sg%>: %>um #;
%<abl%>%<sg%>: %>ō #;
%<abl%>%<sg%>: %>ū #;
%<voc%>%<sg%>: %>ī #;

%<nom%>%<pl%>: %>ūs #;
%<gen%>%<pl%>: %>uum #;
%<gen%>%<pl%>: %>ōrum #;
%<dat%>%<pl%>: %>ibus #;
%<acc%>%<pl%>: %>ūs #;
%<acc%>%<pl%>: %>ōs #;
%<abl%>%<pl%>: %>ibus #;
%<voc%>%<pl%>: %>ūs #;
%<loc%>%<pl%>: %>ibus #;

! Fifth-declension nouns
! Yeah, this one's pretty simple.
LEXICON N5
%<nom%>%<sg%>: %>ēs #;
%<gen%>%<sg%>: %>eī #;	! this one varies based on i stem or no
%<dat%>%<sg%>: %>eī #;
%<acc%>%<sg%>: %>em #;
%<abl%>%<sg%>: %>ē #;
%<voc%>%<sg%>: %>ēs #;
!%<loc%>%<sg%>: %>ē #;

%<nom%>%<pl%>: %>ēs #;
%<gen%>%<pl%>: %>ērum #;
%<dat%>%<pl%>: %>ēbus #;
%<acc%>%<pl%>: %>ēs #;
%<abl%>%<pl%>: %>ēbus #;
%<voc%>%<pl%>: %>ēs #;
!%<loc%>%<pl%>: %>ēbus #;

LEXICON Declension1
terra%<noun%>%<f%>: terr N1;	! "earth"
vīta%<noun%>%<f%>: vīt N1;		! "life"
dea%<noun%>%<f%>: de N1-dea;	! "goddess"

LEXICON Declension2
animus%<noun%>%<m%>: anim N2-M;	! "soul"/"spirit"
deus%<noun%>%<m%>: N2-deus;		! "god" (masculine)
locus%<noun%>%<m%>: loc N2-M;	! "place"/"location"
vir%<noun%>%<m%>: vir N2-M-r;	! "man"

! bellum is the only neuter N2 noun here
! and one of the few nouns with a locative
bellum%<noun%>%<n%>: bell N2-N;	! "war"
bellum%<noun%>%<n%>%<loc%>%<sg%>: bell%>ī #;
bellum%<noun%>%<n%>%<loc%>%<pl%>: bell%>īs #;

LEXICON Declension3
rēx%<noun%>%<m%>%<nom%>%<sg%>: rēx #;
rēx%<noun%>%<m%>%<voc%>%<sg%>: rēx #;
rēx%<noun%>%<m%>: rēg N3-MF;		! "king"

pars%<noun%>%<f%>%<nom%>%<sg%>: pars #;
pars%<noun%>%<f%>%<voc%>%<sg%>: pars #;
pars%<noun%>%<f%>: part N3-MF;		! "part"

pater%<noun%>%<m%>%<nom%>%<sg%>: pater #;
pater%<noun%>%<m%>%<voc%>%<sg%>: pater #;
pater%<noun%>%<m%>: patr N3-MF;		! "father"

corpus%<noun%>%<n%>%<nom%>%<sg%>: corpus #;
corpus%<noun%>%<n%>%<acc%>%<sg%>: corpus #;
corpus%<noun%>%<n%>%<voc%>%<sg%>: corpus #;
corpus%<noun%>%<n%>: corpor N3-N;	! "body"

urbs%<noun%>%<f%>%<nom%>%<sg%>: urbs #;
urbs%<noun%>%<f%>%<voc%>%<sg%>: urbs #;
urbs%<noun%>%<f%>: urb N3-MF;		! "city"

homō%<noun%>%<m%>%<nom%>%<sg%>: homō #;
homō%<noun%>%<m%>%<nom%>%<sg%>: homō #;
homō%<noun%>%<m%>: homin N3-MF;		! "person"

tempus%<noun%>%<n%>%<nom%>%<sg%>: tempus #;
tempus%<noun%>%<n%>%<acc%>%<sg%>: tempus #;
tempus%<noun%>%<n%>%<voc%>%<sg%>: tempus #;
tempus%<noun%>%<n%>: tempor N3-N;	! "time"

LEXICON Declension4
manus%<noun%>%<f%>: man N4-MF;		! "hand"
domus%<noun%>%<f%>: dom N4-domus;	! "home"

LEXICON Declension5
rēs%<noun%>%<f%>: r N5;			! "thing"
diēs%<noun%>%<m%>: di N5;		! "day" can be feminine in certain contexts, but formally a masculine noun

! "Indeclinable" nouns
LEXICON Indeclinable
nihil%<noun%>%<n%>%<nom%>%<sg%>: nihil #;	! "nothing" (irregular/nondeclinable)
nihil%<noun%>%<n%>%<acc%>%<sg%>: nil #;
